California statutes. Financial Code
 last fiscal year shall have amounted to at least the maximum annual debt service requirement for any fiscal year thereafter on all such securities that were outstanding during such last fiscal year and which will be outstanding in any fiscal year thereafter.

(B) The gross income from the property, the net income from which is pledged for the payment of the securities, in the last fiscal year prior to the investment was not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) if located in California, and was not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) if located elsewhere.

(C) The issuer is obligated to maintain rates at least sufficient to meet debt service requirements and such obligation is legally enforceable.

(2) (A) The issuer of the securities is entitled to receive under a legally enforceable
 contract with a corporation any of the securities of which are a legal investment for savings banks under this chapter annual payments averaging not less than nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) a year commencing with the completion of a project or projects as fixed in the construction contract therefor and continuing during the maximum term for which said revenue securities are to mature.

(B) The issuer of the securities is obligated to maintain rates to produce revenue, or will receive contract payments, either or both of which will be sufficient to meet debt service requirements and such obligation or contract is legally enforceable.

(c) The public corporation or any department, board, agency, or authority thereof which issues the securities, if existing elsewhere than in California, has not within 10 years prior to such investment defaulted for a period of more than 90
 days in the payment of principal or interest on any of its debts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

815.

Bonds of any local public housing agency (as defined in the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended) that are secured by either of the following:

(a) An agreement between the public housing agency and the Public Housing Administration in which the public housing agency agrees to borrow from the Public Housing Administration, and the Public Housing Administration agrees to lend to the public housing agency, prior to the
 maturity of the obligations (which obligations shall have a maturity of not more than 18 months), moneys in an amount that (together with any other moneys irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on such obligations) will suffice to pay the principal of the obligations with interest to maturity thereon, which moneys under the terms of the agreement are required to be used for the purpose of paying the principal of and the interest on such obligations at their maturity.

(b) A pledge of annual contributions under an annual contributions contract between such public housing agency and the Public Housing Administration if the contract shall contain the covenant by the Public Housing Administration that is authorized by subsection (b) of Section 22 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, and if the maximum sum and the maximum period specified in such contract pursuant to that subsection 22(b) shall not be less than the annual
 amount and the period for payment that are requisite to provide for the payment when due of all installments of principal and interest on the obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

816.

Bonds secured by an insurance commitment of the Federal Housing Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

817.

Evidences of indebtedness of companies incorporated in the United States and, directly or indirectly, engaged in manufacturing, extraction, merchandising, or commercial financing and in bonds of authorities established pursuant to the California Industrial Development Financing Act (Title 10 (commencing with Section 91500) of the Government Code), to which these companies are obligated with respect to payment subject to the following conditions:

(a) Any unsecured evidences of indebtedness shall be issued by a company substantially all of whose property is free of mortgage and shall carry a covenant by the obligor that they will be secured equally with any mortgage bond, except a purchase money mortgage, which may be later issued.

(b) The company is of a size as to attract at least statewide interest in its publicly held securities and its gross income shall have averaged not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and its net income shall have averaged not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the five fiscal years preceding the investment and its gross income was not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and its net income not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for at least three of these five fiscal years.

(c) Working capital, as
 measured by consolidated current assets less consolidated current liabilities as shown in the latest published balance sheet, shall exceed 150 percent of the total of consolidated debt due in longer than one year and “minority interest.” For that purpose, “minority interest” means any outstanding interest in a subsidiary having a prior claim on the earnings of the subsidiary. However, the foregoing ratio requirement shall not apply in the case of evidences of indebtedness of any corporation whose consolidated gross assets less any valuation reserves exceed five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) and whose consolidated current assets exceed consolidated current liabilities by at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) as shown by the latest published balance sheet. When new financing is involved, the changes in gross assets, capital structure and working capital shall be considered and reliance may be placed on the representations made in the official prospectus prepared under the rules of the
 Securities and Exchange Commission as to the application of the proceeds of the financing.

(d) The total consolidated debt of the company including current liabilities and “minority interest,” as shown on the latest published balance sheet, does not exceed 3313 percent of its gross assets less valuation reserves.

(e) The consolidated annual net income for the five fiscal years next preceding the investment, before deduction of state and federal taxes imposed on or measured by income or profits but after deducting all charges, including reserves, regularly recurring charges for amortization of discount, and expense allocable to funded debt (1) shall have averaged not less than six times the annual consolidated interest charges existing at the time the investment is made; (2) in at
 least three of the five fiscal years shall have been at least four times the annual consolidated interest charges for the same year; and (3) for the fiscal year next preceding the investment shall have been not less than six times the consolidated interest charges for that year and not less than six times the annual consolidated charges on the funded debt outstanding at the time of the investment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

818.

Fixed interest railroad bonds meeting the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b); bonds secured by a mortgage on jointly operated railroad facilities meeting the requirements of subdivision (c); and railroad equipment trust certificates meeting the requirements of subdivision (d).

(a) The railroad bonds are issued by or are assumed, guaranteed, or provision made unconditionally for the payment of principal and interest on specified dates, by a solvent railroad company that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Operates at least 500 miles of standard gauge road within the continental United States and which has had average annual operating revenues of at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) during the five years next
 preceding the investment.

(2) Has an average annual balance of income available for fixed charges for the last 15 years for which the necessary statistical data are available, when divided by an amount equal to its fixed charges for the last fiscal year, shall produce a quotient which is at least 15 percent higher than the quotient obtained by dividing the average annual balance of income available for fixed charges of all class 1 railroads for the same one 5-year period by an amount equal to the fixed charges of all class 1 railroads for the last year in the period.

(3) Has an average “balance of net income” (computed by deducting the sum of its fixed charges and contingent interest charges for the latest fiscal year from the average annual balance available for fixed charges for the latest 15 years for which the necessary statistical data are available) when divided by its
 average annual railroad operating income for the same 15-year period, shall produce a quotient at least 15 percent greater than the quotient obtained by dividing the average balance of income of all class 1 railroads, computed in the same manner, by the average annual railway operating income of all class 1 railroads for the same 15-year period.

(4) Has an average balance of income available for fixed charges for the last three fiscal years preceding the investment that has not been less than one and one-half times its fixed charges for the last fiscal year.

(b) The railroad bonds are secured by any of the following:

(1) A mortgage, either direct or collateral, which shall be a first mortgage on not less than 75 percent of the mileage subject to the mortgage.

(2) A first mortgage on terminal properties comprising the company’s principal freight or passenger terminal in a city of not less than 250,000 population according to the latest federal or state census.

(3) A refunding mortgage on not less than 75 percent of the railroad mileage owned or operated by the issuing company under which bonds may be issued for retirement or refunding of all debts secured by prior liens on all or any part of the property (other than liens on equipment) subject to the mortgage; provided, that the amount of debt senior to the refunding mortgage is not more than 50 percent of the sum of all senior debt and the refunding mortgage, or that underlying mortgage bonds in an amount equal to at least 50 percent of the debt outstanding under the refunding mortgage are pledged as security under the refunding mortgage.

(4) A first mortgage on railroad
 property leased to and operated by the company where the lease extends beyond the maturity date of the bonds and the company has guaranteed, assumed, or committed itself under the terms of the lease to pay principal and interest on the bonds.

(c) Bonds secured by a mortgage on jointly operated railroad facilities must be secured by a first mortgage on a terminal, depot, tunnel, or bridge used by or leased to two or more railroads which have jointly and severally agreed unconditionally to pay the interest and principal of the bonds or have unconditionally guaranteed or assumed the payment, one of which railroads must meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (a).

(d) Railroad equipment trust certificates must be issued by a solvent class 1 railroad whose average balance of income available for fixed charges for the last three fiscal years preceding the investment shall be not
 less than one and one-half times its fixed charges for the last fiscal year. The certificates must be issued to provide funds for the construction or acquisition of new standard gauge railroad equipment made with the approval of the federal Surface Transportation Board and be secured by equipment trust, lease, conditional sales contract, or first lien on equipment. The aggregate principal amount of those obligations shall not exceed 80 percent of the purchase price of the equipment and the certificates shall mature within 15 years from the date of issuance in equal annual, semiannual, or monthly installments, beginning not later than one year after the date of issuance.

(e) As used in this section, the terms “balance of income available for fixed charges,” “fixed charges,” “contingent interest,” and “railway operating income” shall have the same meaning as in the accounting reports filed by common carriers by rail pursuant to regulations of the
 federal Surface Transportation Board except that “balance of income available for payment of fixed charges” shall be computed before deduction of federal income or excess profits taxes, and “fixed charges” and “contingent interest” of the railroad shall be charges existing as of the time the computation is made excluding charges with respect to debt which has been retired or will be retired within six months and for the payment of which funds have been or are contemporaneously being set aside in trust but including charges with respect to new debt issued or in the process of being issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 55.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

819.

Bonds and debentures of gas, electric, or gas and electric companies meeting the requirements of subdivision (a); bonds and debentures of telephone companies meeting the requirements of subdivision (b); and bonds and debentures of water companies meeting the requirements of subdivision (c).

(a) Bonds or debentures of a gas, electric, or gas and electric company shall be of an issue that originally amounted to not less than one
 million dollars ($1,000,000) and, if bonds, be secured by a mortgage on substantially all of its physical property, and, if debentures, shall be issued by a company substantially all of whose physical property is free of mortgage and must carry a covenant to be secured equally with any mortgage indebtedness, except a purchase money mortgage, subsequently issued, and both bonds and debentures shall be issued by a public utility corporation that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Derives more than 50 percent of its gross operating revenue from the business of supplying electricity, artificial gas, or natural gas or all or any of them, and at least 80 percent of its gross operating revenue from all or any of the public utility businesses enumerated in this section.

(2) Shall have had a gross operating revenue of not less than seven million five hundred thousand dollars
 ($7,500,000) for its most recent fiscal year.

(3) Has a funded debt not exceeding two-thirds of the value of its physical property as shown by the books of the corporation or by a statement of a certified public accountant issued within one year, which statement may be based upon the books of the corporation, less the amount of any reserves for depreciation, retirement, or amortization of that physical property. Physical property of a corporation shall include the physical property of a subsidiary corporation if the corporation owns not less than 90 percent of the outstanding voting shares of the subsidiary corporation.

(4) Shall have had earnings including earnings of subsidiaries mentioned in paragraph (3), available for interest payments, before deduction of state and federal taxes imposed on or measured by income or profits, during four of the five most recent fiscal years and
 during the most recent fiscal year equal to at least twice the existing annual interest charges on the corporation’s total funded debt during those respective fiscal years.

(b) Bonds or debentures of telephone companies shall be of an issue originally amounting to at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) and, if bonds, be secured by a mortgage on substantially all of the physical property of the company, and if debentures shall be issued by a company substantially all of whose physical property is free of mortgage and shall carry a covenant to be secured equally with any mortgage indebtedness, except a purchase money mortgage, subsequently issued, and both bonds and debentures shall be issued by a company that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) During its last fiscal year had gross revenues of at least seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000), more than 50
 percent of which was derived from owned properties used in furnishing telephone and other communication services and at least 80 percent of its gross revenues from all or any of the public utility businesses enumerated in this section.

(2) Whose funded debt does not exceed two-thirds of the value of its physical property as shown by the books of the corporation or by a statement of a certified public accountant issued within one year, which statement may be based upon the books of the corporation, less the amount of any reserves shown on the statement for depreciation, retirement or amortization of such physical property. Physical property of a corporation shall include the physical property of a subsidiary corporation if the corporation owns not less than 90 percent of the outstanding voting shares of the subsidiary corporation.

(3) Which for four of the five most recent fiscal
 years and for the last fiscal year had earnings including earnings of subsidiaries mentioned in paragraph (2) available for the payment of interest charges, before deduction of state and federal taxes imposed on or measured by income or profits, at least equal to twice the interest charges on the company’s total funded debt during such respective fiscal years.

(c) Water company bonds or debentures shall be of an issue originally amounting to at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) and if bonds, be secured by a first mortgage on the company’s property, and if debentures, shall be issued by a company substantially all of whose property is free of mortgage and shall carry a covenant to be secured equally with any mortgage indebtedness, except a purchase money mortgage, subsequently issued, and both bonds and debentures shall be issued by a company that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Is the supplier of substantially all water for domestic use in a community or communities having a population of not less than 25,000.

(2) Whose funded debt does not exceed two-thirds of the value of its physical property as shown by the published statement of the company for its next preceding fiscal period, less the amount of any reserves shown for depreciation, retirement or amortization of such physical property. Physical property of a corporation shall include the physical property of a subsidiary corporation if the corporation owns not less than 90 percent of the outstanding voting shares of the subsidiary corporation.

(3) Which for four out of the five most recent fiscal years and for the most recent fiscal year shall have had earnings including those of subsidiaries mentioned in paragraph (2) available for the payment of interest charges, before deduction
 of state and federal taxes imposed on or measured by income or profits, of at least one and one-half times the interest charges on the company’s total funded debt during the respective fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Financial Abuse of Victims of Domestic Violence [900. - 900.]

900.

(a) Commencing on or before January 1, 2027, the department shall make available to financial institutions and the general public online resources related to financial abuse of victims of domestic violence for the purpose of protecting survivors’ assets and resources.

(b) The online financial abuse resources shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Information on the nexus between domestic violence and financial security.

(2) Information on the prevalence and impacts of financial abuse as it relates to domestic violence and
 a survivor’s employment and credit history.

(3) Information regarding the heightened need to protect the privacy and to respect the integrity of each individual survivor customer of a financial institution.

(4) Information regarding the heightened need to respect the autonomy and agency of each individual survivor customer, including the survivor customer’s decision whether or not to inform law enforcement of the financial abuse.

(c) The department may utilize existing
 internet websites, links, and other online resources and materials from state government departments, nonprofit organizations, and community groups, as appropriate, in order to meet the requirement described in subdivision (a).

(d) This section does not require financial institutions using the information provided online by the department to become mandated reporters of domestic violence.

(e) The department shall annually review and update the online resources required to be posted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 650, Sec. 1.   (AB 2422)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.1. BANKING [1000. - 1910.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1000. - 1008.]

1000.

When authorized by the commissioner as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1040) a corporation may be formed by one or more persons in accordance with the laws of this state for the purpose of conducting a commercial banking business or a trust business, or both of them. The qualification requirements of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 shall not apply to the offer and sale of securities issued by and representing an interest in or a direct obligation of a bank or trust
 company incorporated under the laws of this state if the securities are offered and sold pursuant to the commissioner’s authorization described in Section 1201 or the securities are exempt from authorization pursuant to Section 1202, or by a regulation or order of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.

This division is known, and may be cited, as the “Banking Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 10.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

No bank shall be a close corporation (as defined in Section 158 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

Except where explicitly stated or the context provides otherwise, this division is applicable to the following:

(a) All corporations engaging in commercial banking, industrial banking, or the trust business.

(b) All national banking associations authorized to transact business in this state to the extent that the provisions of this division are not inconsistent
 with and do not infringe paramount federal laws governing national banking associations.

(c) All other corporations that subject themselves to the special provisions and sections of this division.

(d) All other persons, associations, copartnerships, or corporations who, by violating any of its provisions, become subject to the penalties provided for in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

(a) A California state bank is a corporation incorporated under Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code or, in the case of a public bank, a corporation incorporated under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, that is, with the approval of the commissioner, incorporated for the purpose of engaging in, or that is authorized by the commissioner to engage in, the commercial or industrial banking business.

(b) (1) All provisions of law applicable to corporations generally, including, but not limited to, the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), Title 1 of the Corporations Code) shall apply to a
 bank that is not a public bank. However, whenever any provision of this division or any regulation or order issued under any provision (other than this section) of this division applicable to banks is inconsistent with any provision of law applicable to corporations generally, that provision of this division or that regulation or order shall apply and the provision of law applicable to corporations generally shall not apply.

(2) All provisions of law applicable to nonprofit corporations generally, including, but not limited to, the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000), Title 1 of the Corporations Code) shall apply to public banks. Whenever a provision of Division 5 of Title 5 of the Government Code applicable to public banks is inconsistent with a provision of law applicable to nonprofit mutual benefit corporations or nonprofit public benefit corporations generally, the provision of Division 5 of Title 5 of the
 Government Code applicable to public banks shall apply, and the inconsistent provision of law applicable to nonprofit mutual benefit corporations or nonprofit public benefit corporations generally shall not apply to a public bank.

(c) As used in this section, public bank has the same meaning as defined in Section 57600 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 442, Sec. 5.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.

It shall be unlawful for any person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, firm, or any other form of business entity allowed by law, to engage in or transact commercial banking business, industrial banking business, or trust business within this state except by means of a corporation duly organized for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.

No corporation shall hereafter be organized under the laws of this state to transact the business of a commercial bank, industrial bank, or trust company, except as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1007.

Neither the enactment of this code nor the amendment or repeal thereof, nor the repeal of any statute affected thereby, shall take away or impair any liability or cause of action existing or incurred against any bank or trust company, or the shareholders, directors, or officers thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1008.

When applicable to a corporation organized as a public bank, as defined in Section 57600 of the Government Code, references in this division to share, shareholder, or stockholder shall mean membership or member in the public bank, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 442, Sec. 6.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Application [1020. - 1027.]

1020.

The request for authority to organize and establish a corporation to engage in the banking or trust business shall be set forth in an application in such form and containing such information as the commissioner may require and shall be accompanied by a fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.

Upon receiving a request for an application, the commissioner shall inform the prospective applicant in writing that the commissioner is available to confer with such prospective applicant in advance of the filing of an application for the purpose of discussing questions relating to such application. However, no application shall be decided in advance of filing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1022.

Upon the filing of an application the commissioner shall make or cause to be made a careful investigation and examination relative to the following:

(a) The character, reputation, and financial standing of the organizers or incorporators and their motives in seeking to organize the proposed bank or trust company.

(b) The need for banking or trust facilities or
 additional banking or trust facilities, as the case may be, giving particular consideration to the adequacy of existing banking or trust facilities and the need for further banking or trust facilities.

(c) The character, financial responsibility, banking or trust experience, and business qualifications of the proposed officers of the bank or trust company.

(d) The character, financial responsibility, business experience, and standing of the proposed stockholders and directors.

(e) Other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposed bank or trust company and its relation to the locality as in the opinion of the commissioner may be relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.

The commissioner may give or withhold his or her approval of the application in his or her discretion, but he or she shall not approve the application until he or she has ascertained to his or her satisfaction:

(a) That the public convenience and advantage will be promoted by the establishment of the proposed bank or trust company.

(b) That the proposed bank or
 trust company will have a reasonable promise of successful operation.

(c) That the bank is being formed for no other purpose than the legitimate objects contemplated by this division.

(d) That the proposed capital structure is adequate.

(e) That the proposed officers and directors have sufficient banking or trust experience, ability, and standing to afford reasonable promise of successful operation.

(f) That the name of the proposed bank or trust company does not resemble, so closely as to be likely to cause confusion, the name of any other bank or trust company transacting business in this state or which had previously transacted business in this state.

(g) That the applicant has complied
 with all of the applicable provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1024.

(a) In this section, “control” has the meaning set forth in Section 1250.

(b) For purposes of Section 1023, the commissioner may find:

(1) That a proposed officer or director of a proposed bank or trust company does not have sufficient standing to afford reasonable promise of successful operation if such person has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, any crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

(2) That the establishment of a proposed bank or trust company will not promote the public convenience and advantage if any person who is proposed to control
 the proposed bank or trust company or any director or officer of such person has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, any crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not be deemed to be the only grounds upon which the commissioner may find, for purposes of Section 1023, that a proposed officer or director of a proposed bank or trust company does not have sufficient standing to afford reasonable promise of successful operation or that the establishment of a proposed bank or trust company will not promote the public convenience and advantage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 32.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.

At least 30 days before denying an application, the commissioner shall by mail or other method of service give written notice of the intended denial of an application and of the right of the applicant to meet with the commissioner regarding the reasons for such denial. The request for such meeting shall be in writing and delivered to the commissioner within 20 calendar days of the date of giving of the notice of intended denial. If a request is made for such meeting, the application may
 not be denied until after the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.

The commissioner may, in approving an application to organize and establish a corporation to engage in the banking or trust business pursuant to Section 1023, impose any conditions the commissioner deems reasonable or necessary or advisable in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 33.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.

(a) With the approval of the commissioner, a bank may be formed to facilitate a merger or an acquisition of control. The new bank may survive the merger or acquisition of control.

(b) Sections 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, and 1024 shall not apply to the formation of a bank pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Article 4 (commencing with Section 370) of Chapter 3 of
 Division 1 shall apply to a bank formed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) A request for approval to form a bank in accordance with subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Authorization to Engage in Banking [1040. - 1048.]

1040.

In this article:

(a) “Preopening expenditure” means any obligation incurred, or sum disbursed, by a bank prior to the time when it commences to transact banking business, for the purpose of organizing such bank.

(b) “Preopening noncapital expenditure” means any preopening expenditure other than such preopening expenditures as may be
 capitalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1041.

The articles of incorporation of the proposed bank or trust company shall be submitted to the commissioner for his or her approval before they are filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Corporations Code. After the articles have been filed with the Secretary of State the proposed bank or trust company shall:

(a) File with the commissioner a copy of its articles of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of
 State.

(b) File with the commissioner a statement in the form and with any supporting data as the commissioner may require showing that the entire contributed capital has been fully paid in lawful money, unconditionally, and that the funds representing the contributed capital, less sums spent as authorized by this article for preopening expenditures are on deposit in a state or national bank in this state, subject to withdrawal on demand.

(c) Pay to the commissioner a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

If the commissioner finds that the proposed bank or trust company has in good faith complied with all the requirements of law and fulfilled all the conditions precedent to commencing business imposed by this code or by regulation, the commissioner shall, within 30 days after the statement and supporting data specified in Section 1041 have been filed with him or her, issue in duplicate a certificate of authorization to transact business as a bank or trust company, as the case may be, and
 shall transmit one copy to the bank or trust company and place one copy on file in the department. The certificate of authorization shall state that the corporation named therein has complied with all the provisions of this code governing organization of banks or trust companies and that it is authorized to transact the business specified therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

It shall be unlawful to accept payment of subscriptions for shares of any corporation proposing to engage in the banking or trust business unless authority to organize such corporation has been granted by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

No corporation organized to transact a commercial banking or trust business shall transact any business until the commissioner has issued his or her certificate authorizing it to transact such business. No bank or trust company shall incur any indebtedness except that which is incidental to its organization until the amount of its contributed capital has been fully paid in lawful money to the cashier or chief financial officer thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1045.

If the proposed bank or trust company fails to file evidence of incorporation and organization with the commissioner pursuant to Section 1041 within one year after the approval of the application for authority to organize the bank or trust company, the right to organize the bank or trust company automatically terminates. The commissioner, however, for good cause on written application filed before the expiration of the original period or any additional period, as the case may be, and
 payment of a fee of one hundred dollars ($100), may extend for additional periods not in excess of six months each the time within which the bank or trust company may be organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1046.

If the proposed bank or trust company fails to open for business within 90 days after the issuance of the certificate of authorization, the right to transact business automatically terminates. The commissioner, however, for good cause on written application filed before the end of said 90-day period, may extend for one additional period of not to exceed 90 days the time within which the bank or trust company may open for business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1047.

It is unlawful to apply any part of the funds collected from subscribers or shareholders to the payment of commissions or fees for obtaining subscriptions or selling shares or, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, to the payment of preopening noncapital expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.

Every bank and trust company shall keep posted in a conspicuous place in its banking room at its head office the certificate of authority to transact a banking or trust business issued by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Bank Offices [1070. - 1083.]

1070.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
